Utah statutes.
10-8-8.   Streets, parks, airports, parking facilities, public grounds, and pedestrian malls.

A municipal legislative body may lay out, establish, open, alter, widen, narrow, extend, grade, pave, or otherwise improve streets, alleys, avenues, boulevards, sidewalks, parks, airports, parking lots, or other facilities for the parking of vehicles off streets, public grounds, and pedestrian malls and may vacate the same or parts thereof, as provided in this title.

